Washington statutes.
RCW 39.104.110

Issuance of general obligation bonds.

(1) A sponsoring local government creating a revitalization area and authorizing the use of local revitalization financing may incur general indebtedness, including issuing general obligation bonds, to finance the public improvements and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part from local revitalization financing it receives, subject to the following requirements:

(a)(i) The ordinance adopted by the sponsoring local government creating the revitalization area and authorizing the use of local revitalization financing indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated; and

(ii) The sponsoring local government includes this statement of intent in all notices required by RCW 39.104.040; or

(b) The sponsoring local government adopts a resolution, after opportunity for public comment, that indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated.

(2) The general indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this section may be payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and credit of the sponsoring local government, and nontax income, revenues, fees, and rents from the public improvements, as well as contributions, grants, and nontax money available to the local government for payment of costs of the public improvements or associated debt service on the general indebtedness.

(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this section, a sponsoring local government creating a revitalization area and authorizing the use of local revitalization financing may require any nonpublic participants to provide adequate security to protect the public investment in the public improvement within the revitalization area.

(4) Bonds issued under this section must be authorized by ordinance of the sponsoring local government and may be issued in one or more series and must bear a date or dates, be payable upon demand or mature at a time or times, bear interest at a rate or rates, be in a denomination or denominations, be in a form either coupon or registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030, carry conversion or registration privileges, have a rank or priority, be executed in a manner, be payable in a medium of payment, at a place or places, and be subject to terms of redemption with or without premium, be secured in a manner, and have other characteristics, as may be provided by an ordinance or trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.

(5) The sponsoring local government may:

(a) Annually pay into a special fund to be established for the benefit of bonds issued under this section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any local property tax allocation revenues derived from property within the revitalization area containing the public improvements funded by the bonds, the payment to continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full;

(b) Annually pay into the special fund established pursuant to this section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any revenues derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.510, such payment to continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full. Revenues derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.510 are subject to the use restriction in RCW 82.14.515; and

(c) Issue revenue bonds payable from any or all revenues deposited in the special fund established pursuant to this section.

(6) In case any of the public officials of the sponsoring local government whose signatures appear on any bonds or any coupons issued under this chapter cease to be the officials before the delivery of the bonds, the signatures must, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if the officials had remained in office until the delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this chapter are fully negotiable.

(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4) through (6) of this section, bonds issued under this section may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 2010 c 164 s 7; 2009 c 270 s 701.]